apertium-ain.ain.twol
Alphabet
 ア イ ウ エ オ 
 ァ ィ ゥ ェ ォ
 カ キ ク ケ コ ㇰ
 サ シ ス セ ソ ㇱ
 タ チ    テ ト ッ
 ナ ニ ヌ ネ ノ ン 
 ハ ヒ フ ヘ ホ
 ㇵ ㇶ ㇷ ㇸ ㇹ
 パ ピ プ ペ ポ ㇷ゚
 マ ミ ム メ モ ㇺ
 ヤ    ユ    ヨ
 ャ    ュ    ョ
 ラ リ ル レ ロ
 ㇻ ㇼ ㇽ ㇾ ㇿ
 ワ 
 
 %  %, %. %... %: %; %=
 %[ %] %" %( %) %« %» %/ %\ %! %? 
 
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z

! 
! %{I%}:ヒ ! %{I%}:0 %{I%}:イ
! 
! %{i%}:イ  ! %{i%}:0
! 
! %{U%}:ウ ! %{U%}:ム %{U%}:ト゚ %{U%}:ク %{U%}:ュ %{U%}:0
! 
! %{pe%}:0 ! %{pe}:ペ
! 
! 
! %{K%}:ク ! %{K%}:カ %{K%}:コ %{K%}:キ %{K%}:ケ
! 
! %{w%}:0 ! %{w%}:ウ
! 
! %{t%}:0 ! %{t%}:ッ 
! 
! %{Tt%}:ㇳ ! %{Tt%}:0 %{Tt%}:ト゚ 
! %{Kk%}:ㇰ ! %{Kk%}:0 %{Kk%}:ク 
! %{Mm%}:ㇺ ! %{Kk%}:0 %{Kk%}:ム 
! 

%>:0 
;

Rules 

"remove Katakana vowel after consonant"
Cx:0 <=> Cy: %>:* _ ;
    where Cx in ( ア イ ウ エ オ )
          Cy in ( ㇰ ㇱ ッ ン ㇷ゚ ㇺ ㇻ ㇼ ㇽ ㇾ ㇿ ) ;

"convert k before vowel into one Katakana"
ㇰ:Cy <=> _ %>:* Cx: ;
    where Cx in ( ア イ ウ エ オ )
          Cy in ( カ キ ク ケ コ )
    matched ;

"convert s before vowel into one Katakana"
ㇱ:Cy <=> _ %>:* Cx: ;
    where Cx in ( ア イ ウ エ オ )
          Cy in ( サ シ ス セ ソ )
    matched ;

"convert t before vowel into one Katakana"
ッ:Cy <=> _ %>:* Cx: ;
    where Cx in ( ア イ エ オ )
          Cy in ( タ チ テ ト )
    matched ;

"convert n before vowel into one Katakana"
ン:Cy <=> _ %>:* Cx: ;
    where Cx in ( ア イ ウ エ オ )
          Cy in ( ナ ニ ヌ ネ ノ )
    matched ;

!"convert p before vowel into one Katakana"
!ㇷ゚:Cy <=> _ %>:* Cx: ;
!    where Cx in ( ア イ ウ エ オ )
!          Cy in ( パ ピ プ ペ ポ )
!    matched ;

"convert m before vowel into one Katakana"
ㇺ:Cy <=> _ %>:* Cx: ;
    where Cx in ( ア イ ウ エ オ )
          Cy in ( マ ミ ム メ モ )
    matched ;

"convert ra before vowel into one Katakana"
ㇻ:Cy <=> _ %>:* Cx: ;
    where Cx in ( ア イ ウ エ オ )
          Cy in ( ラ リ ル レ ロ )
    matched ;

"convert ri before vowel into one Katakana"
ㇼ:Cy <=> _ %>:* Cx: ;
    where Cx in ( ア イ ウ エ オ )
          Cy in ( ラ リ ル レ ロ )
    matched ;

"convert ru before vowel into one Katakana"
ㇽ:Cy <=> _ %>:* Cx: ;
    where Cx in ( ア イ ウ エ オ )
          Cy in ( ラ リ ル レ ロ )
    matched ;

"convert re before vowel into one Katakana"
ㇾ:Cy <=> _ %>:* Cx: ;
    where Cx in ( ア イ ウ エ オ )
          Cy in ( ラ リ ル レ ロ )
    matched ;

"convert ro before vowel into one Katakana"
ㇿ:Cy <=> _ %>:* Cx: ;
    where Cx in ( ア イ ウ エ オ )
          Cy in ( ラ リ ル レ ロ )
    matched ;

! "have {w} be ウ when before e or E"
! %{w%}:ウ <=> _ :ェ ;
! 	     _ :エ ; 
! 
! "have {K} be ka only before ra"
! %{K%}:カ <=> _ :ラ ;
! 
! 
! "have {U} be small yu only after shi"
! %{U%}:ュ <=> :シ %>: _ ;
! 
! "have {U} be ム only after {Mm}"
! %{U%}:ム <=> %{Mm%}: %>: _ ;
! 
! "have {Mm} be null before {U} is mu"
! %{Mm%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{U%}:ム ;
! 
! "have {U} be ト゚ only after {Tt}"
! %{U%}:ト゚ <=> %{Tt%}: %>: _ ;
! 
! "have {Tt} be null before {U} is tu"
! %{Tt%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{U%}:ト゚ ;
! 
! "have {U} be ku only after {Kk}"
! %{U%}:ク <=> %{Kk%}: %>: _ ;
! 
! "have {Kk} be null before {U} is ku}"
! %{Kk%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{U%}:ク ;
! 
! "have {i} be null after {U} is U"
! %{i%}:0 <=> %{U%}:ウ %>: _ ;

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
